Maine, session 132, LD953.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1051, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 499, §1, is amended
to read:
2. As used in this chapter, "machine gun" means a weapon of any description, by
whatever name known, loaded or unloaded, which is capable of discharging a number of
projectiles in rapid succession by one manual or mechanical action on the trigger or firing
mechanism. that shoots, is designed to shoot or can be readily restored to shoot
automatically more than one shot by a single function of the trigger without manually
reloading. "Machine gun" includes:
A. The frame or receiver of a weapon described in this subsection. For purposes of
this paragraph, "frame" means the housing of a firearm that surrounds the receiver and
"receiver" means the rotor, bolts and firing mechanism of a firearm;
B. A part or combination of parts designed and intended solely to convert a weapon
into a weapon described in this subsection; or
C. Any combination of parts, if the parts are collected together in one group, from
which a weapon described in this subsection can be assembled.